Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
383

HAWAII
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW

Part I. Definitions

Section

383-1 Definitions, generally

383-2 Definition of employment

383-3 Place of performance

383-4 Election of employing unit

383-5 Service localized where

383-6 Master and servant relationship, not
required when

383-7 Excluded service

383-7.5 Part-time work; benefits available

383-7.6 Separation for compelling family reason

383-8 Included and excluded service

383-9 Agricultural labor

383-10 Definition of wages

383-11 Excluded payments

383-12 Requirement to post work availability
online

Part II. Benefits

383-21 Payment of benefits

383-22 Weekly benefit amount; computation,
minimum and

maximum

383-23 Weekly benefit for unemployment

383-23.5 Retirement payments

383-24 Maximum potential benefits

383-25 to 28 Repealed

383-29 Eligibility for benefits

383-29.5 Benefits during training

383-29.6 Partial unemployment; eligibility

383-29.7 Partial unemployment; claim filing
requirements,

determinations

383-29.8 Partial unemployment; waivers

383-29.9 Partial unemployment; reporting
requirements

383-30 Disqualification for benefits

383-30.5 Good cause for separation from part-time
employment

383-31 Posting of information

383-32 Filing of claim

383-33 Determinations, in general

383-34 Reconsideration of determination

383-35 Appeal pending when redetermination issued

383-36 Notice of determinations

383-37 Appeal tribunal

383-38 Appeals, filing, and hearing

383-39 Procedure

383-40 Conclusiveness of determinations and
decisions

383-41 Judicial review

383-42 Representation

383-43 Payment of benefits

383-44 Recovery of benefits paid

383-45 Governing provisions

Part III. Contributions and Coverage

383-61 Payment of contributions; wages not
included

383-61.5 Special assessments on employers to pay
interest

on loans from Secretary of Labor

383-62 Rate of contributions; financing benefits
paid to

government employees and employees of
nonprofit

organizations

383-62.5 Treatment of Indian tribes

383-63 Definitions for experience rating
provisions

383-64 Credits for contributions; destruction of
employer

accounts and records

383-65 Charges and noncharges for benefits

383-66 Contribution rates, how determined

383-67 Reserve ratio

383-68 Contribution rate schedules; fund solvency
rate

schedule; rates based on experience

383-69 Procedure for rate determination

383-70 Contributions; levy; returns; assessments

383-71 Collection of delinquent contributions

383-72 Priorities under legal dissolutions or

distributions

383-73 Penalty for delinquency; remission

383-74 Appeal; correction of assessment or
contributions

383-75 Compromise

383-76 Refunds and adjustments

383-77 Employers' coverage, election

383-78 Repealed

383-79 Combining services performed for
predecessor and

successor employing units

383-80 Income tax refund offsets

Part IV. Administration

383-91 Duties and powers of department, director

383-92 Rules and regulations

383-92.5 Worker profiling

383-93 Investigation of unemployment hazard

383-94 Records and reports

383-95 Disclosure of information

383-96 Service

383-97 Change of rates

383-98 Referee

383-99 Oaths and subpoenas

383-100 Protection against self-incrimination

383-101 Relation to chapter 371

383-102 Preservation and destruction of records

383-103 Representation in civil and criminal
actions

383-104 State employment service

383-105 Federal-state cooperation

383-106 What reciprocal arrangements authorized

383-107 Reimbursement payments deemed benefits,
when

383-108 Cooperation with states, etc.

383-109 Cooperation with foreign governments

Part V. Funds

383-121 Unemployment compensation trust fund;
establishment

and control

383-121.5 Renumbered

383-122 Accounts and deposit

383-123 Withdrawals; administrative use

383-124 Relation to unemployment trust fund

383-125 Financing employment security
administration

383-126 Reimbursement of fund

383-126.5 Evaluation of fund balance adequacy

383-127 Special unemployment insurance
administration fund

383-128 Employment and training fund established

383-129 Employment and training assessment

Part VI. Penalties

383-141 Falsely obtaining benefits, etc.

383-142 Employing units

383-143 General penalty

383-144 Unlawful disclosures

Part VII. Miscellaneous Provisions

383-161 Waiver of rights void

383-162 Limitation of fees

383-163 No assignment of benefits; waiver

383-163.5 Child support intercept of unemployment
benefits

383-163.6 Voluntary deduction and withholding of federal
and

state income taxes

383-163.7 Deduction and withholding of uncollected
food stamp

overissuances

383-164 Nonliability of State

383-165 Saving clause, amendment, or repeal

383-166 Conformity with federal law

383-167 Amendment or repeal of federal law, effect
of;

nonconformity, effect of

383-168 Definitions

383-169 Effect of state law provisions relating to
regular

benefits on claims for, and the payment
of, extended

benefits

383-170 Eligibility requirements for extended
benefits

383-170.5 Ineligibility for extended benefits when
paid under

an interstate claim in a state where
extended benefit

period is not in effect

383-171 Weekly extended benefit amount

383-172 Total extended benefit amount

383-173 Beginning and termination of extended
benefit period

383-174 Computations

383-176 Limitation of extended benefits by trade

readjustment allowance

Note

L 2012, c 6, §5 provides:

"SECTION 5. (a) The director of labor and industrial
relations may utilize section 103-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, or may borrow
moneys from the federal government pursuant to title XII of the Social Security
Act, to cover the insolvency of the unemployment compensation fund.

(b) The director of labor and industrial relations shall use
the loan proceeds only to pay unemployment benefits pursuant to chapter 383,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and may not use the loan proceeds to pay for any other
expenses such as administrative expenses."

Skilled worker and business development center at each
University of Hawaii community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

State additional benefits for Maui county (repealed October
28, 2017). L 2016, c 70.

Law Journals and Reviews

Relief for Manufacturers and Wholesalers: A Proposal to
Exclude Commissions Paid to Part-Time Sales Representatives from Hawaii's
Unemployment Tax. II HBJ, no. 13, at 35 (1998).

Case Notes

Department is under no duty to maximize amount of benefits
that applicant is entitled to by alerting applicant to possible alternatives.
55 H. 250, 517 P.2d 773 (1973).

Conformity to coverage under federal unemployment law not
required. 68 H. 410, 718 P.2d 267 (1986).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next